Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 1 General Provisions

42-6-1.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of corrections.

“Department” means the Department of Corrections.

“Detainer” means a written instrument executed by the prosecuting officer of a court and filed with the department requesting that the department retain custody of an inmate pending delivery of the inmate to the proper authorities to stand trial upon a pending indictment or accusation, or to await final disposition of all appeals and other motions which are pending on any outstanding sentence, and to which is attached a copy of the indictment, accusation, or conviction which constitutes the basis of the request. The request shall contain a statement that the prosecuting officer desires and intends to bring the inmate to trial upon the pending indictment or accusation, and in the case of an outstanding sentence, that he intends to seek final disposition of all appeals and other motions.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1373, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1.

42-6-2.
When detainers to be accepted and filed by department.

The department shall accept and file only those detainers which meet the requirements of this article and which are filed in accordance with this article; provided, however, this article shall not apply to detainers filed by the authorities of the United States government or of any of the other several states or of any foreign state.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1.

42-6-3.
Time limit for trial; notice and request for final disposition; notification of inmate and interested parties; effect of escape by inmate.

Whenever a person has entered upon a term of imprisonment in a penal institution under the jurisdiction of the department and whenever during the continuance of the term of imprisonment there is pending in any court in this state any untried indictment or accusation on the basis of which a detainer has been filed against such an inmate, he shall be brought to trial within two terms of court after he has caused to be delivered to the prosecuting officer and the clerk of the appropriate court of the prosecuting officer’s jurisdiction written notice of the place of his imprisonment and his request that a final disposition be made of the indictment or accusation; provided, however, that, for good cause shown in open court, the inmate or his counsel being present, the court having jurisdiction of the matter may grant any necessary or reasonable continuance. The request of the inmate shall be accompanied by a certificate of the department stating the term of commitment under which the inmate is being held, the computed expiration date of the commitment, and the time of parole eligibility of the inmate.

The written notice and request for final disposition referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be given or sent by the inmate to the commissioner who shall promptly forward it, together with the certificate referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, to the appropriate prosecuting officer and court by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery.

Within 15 days, the warden, superintendent, or other official having physical custody of the inmate shall inform him of the source and furnish him with a copy of the contents of any detainer filed against him and shall also inform him of his right to make a request for a final disposition of the indictment or accusation upon which the detainer is based.

Any request for final disposition of a pending indictment or accusation made by an inmate pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall operate as a request for final disposition of all untried indictments or accusations on the basis of which detainers have been filed against the inmate from the county to whose prosecuting official the request for a final disposition is specifically directed. The commissioner shall promptly notify all interested prosecuting officers and courts in the several jurisdictions within the county to which the inmate’s request for final disposition is being sent of the proceeding being initiated by the inmate. Notification sent pursuant to this subsection shall be accompanied by copies of the inmate’s written notice and request and by the certificate. If trial is not had on any indictment or accusation upon which a detainer has been based within two terms of court after the receipt by the appropriate prosecuting officers and court of the inmate’s request for final disposition, provided no continuance has been granted, all detainers based upon such pending indictments or accusations shall be stricken and dismissed from the records of the department.

Escape from custody by an inmate subsequent to his execution of the request for a final disposition of any pending indictment or accusation shall automatically void the request for final disposition and the same shall be stricken and dismissed from the records of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Cross references.

Demand for trial generally, §

17-7-170

et seq.

42-6-4.
Effect of failure to meet time limit for trial after delivery of inmate pursuant to Code Section 24-13-60.

If an inmate is not brought to trial upon a pending indictment or accusation within two terms of court after delivery of the inmate to the sheriff or a deputy sheriff pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 24-13-60, provided no continuance has been granted, all detainers based upon the pending indictments or accusations shall be stricken and dismissed from the records of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 62/HB 24.

Cross references.

Demand for trial generally, §

17-7-170

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

42-6-5.
Temporary custody of inmate requesting disposition of pending indictment or accusation.

In response to the request of an inmate for final disposition of any pending indictment or accusation made pursuant to Code Section 42-6-3 or pursuant to an order of a court entered pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 24-13-60, the department shall offer to deliver temporary custody of the inmate to the sheriff or a deputy sheriff of the county in which the indictment or accusation is pending against the inmate. The judge of the court in which the proceedings are pending is authorized to and shall issue an ex parte order directed to the department requiring the delivery of the inmate to the sheriff or a deputy sheriff of the county in which the trial is to be held.

The sheriff or a deputy sheriff of a county accepting temporary custody of an inmate shall present proper identification and a certified copy of the indictment or accusation upon which trial is to be had.

If the sheriff or deputy sheriff fails or refuses to accept temporary custody of the inmate, detainers based upon indictments or accusations upon which trial has been sought shall be stricken and dismissed from the records of the department.

The temporary custody referred to in this article shall be only for the purpose of permitting prosecution on the pending indictments or accusations which form the basis of the detainer or detainers filed against the inmate.

At the earliest practicable time consonant with the purposes of this article, the inmate shall be returned by the sheriff or a deputy sheriff to the custody of the department.

During the continuance of temporary custody or while the inmate is otherwise being made available for trial as required by this article, the sentence being served by the inmate shall continue to run and good time shall be earned by the inmate to the same extent that the law allows for any other inmate serving under the jurisdiction of the department.

From the time that the sheriff or a deputy sheriff receives custody of an inmate pursuant to this article and until the inmate is returned to the physical custody of the department, the county to which the inmate is transported shall be responsible for the safekeeping of the inmate and shall pay all costs of transporting, caring for, keeping, and returning the inmate. Any habeas corpus action instituted by the inmate while in the custody of the sheriff shall be defended by the county attorney and the expenses of such litigation shall be paid by the county.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 606, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 63/HB 24.

Cross references.

Demand for trial generally, §

17-7-170

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

42-6-6.
Applicability of article to mentally ill persons.

This article shall not apply to any person who has been adjudged to be mentally ill.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1110, § 1.

Cross references.

Examination, treatment, hospitalization of mentally ill persons generally,
T. 37, C. 3.